src/fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON V_HUYTXW !CHECKME 2024-01-23
 V_BECHDUB ;
:xʷ 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_HUY !CHECKME 2024-02-24
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL
+Dial/-NL: V_KWEDYID ;
LEXICON V_KWEDYID ! kʷədyid+V:kʷədyíd
+Dat: V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_CUTEB_Dial/-NL
+Dial/-NL: V_CUTEB ;
LEXICON V_CUTEB !CHECKME 2024-01-24
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON TV_SELPED !səlpəd:səlpəd
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_SELPED !səlpəd:səlpəd
: 0V_KWEDAD ;

LEXICON V_KWEDAD_Dial/-NL
+Dial/-NL: V_KWEDAD ;
!LEXICON TV_KWEDAD
!+TV: 0V_KWEDAD ;
LEXICON V_KWEDAD
: 0V_KWEDAD ;


LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD
!! kʷədad:kʷədad
+Der/Red2_3L:%^RedPL123123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_12123:%^Red12123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1i123:%^Red1i123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_12q123:%^Red12q123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1iq123:%^Red1iq123 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1213:%^Red1213 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1i13:%^Red1i13 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_12q13:%^Red12q13 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
+Der/Dimin_1iq13:%^Red1iq13 0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
0V_KWEDAD_01a ;
LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_01a
 0V_KWEDAD_01b ;
+Pass:%^Pen%^RmVOW%^d2t%>əb 0V_HELHED_01b ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_01b
!! kʷədad:kʷədad
! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ 0V_KWEDAD_02 ;
@D.TAM-SUBJ@ 0V_KWEDAD_02 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_02
@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@ 0V_KWEDAD_03 ;
@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@ 0V_KWEDAD_03 ;
@D.TAM-HAB@ 0V_KWEDAD_03 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_03
@R.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@R.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_KWEDAD_04 ;
@D.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_KWEDAD_04 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_04
@R.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@R.TAM-T.REM@ 0V_KWEDAD_05 ;
@D.TAM-T@ 0V_KWEDAD_05 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_05
@R.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@R.TAM-A.STAT@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@R.TAM-A.PROG@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@R.TAM-A.PFV@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.CONT@+Asp/Cont:@R.TAM-A.CONT@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;
@D.TAM-A@ 0V_KWEDAD_06 ;

LEXICON 0V_KWEDAD_06
@R.NMZ.V2N@+Vnoun:@R.NMZ.V2N@ OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@R.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@R.NMZ.V2A@ OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;
@D.NMZ@ OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS ;


LEXICON IV_HELHED
!! q̓ʷuʔ "gather"
!!! ʔəɬəd+V:ʔəɬəd
!! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
+IV: 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON V_HELHED
!! ʔəɬəd+V:ʔəɬəd
! @U.TAM-A.PRF@
: 0V_HELHED ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED
+Der/Red2_3L:%^Red123123 0V_HELHED_01a ;
 0V_HELHED_01a ;
LEXICON 0V_HELHED_01a
 0V_HELHED_01b ;
LEXICON 0V_HELHED_01b
@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@+Mod/Subj:@R.TAM-SUBJ.SUBJ@ 0V_HELHED_02 ;
@D.TAM-SUBJ@ 0V_HELHED_02 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_02
@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@+Hab:@R.TAM-HAB.HAB@ 0V_HELHED_03 ;
@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@+Irr:@R.TAM-HAB.IRR@ 0V_HELHED_03 ;
@D.TAM-HAB@ 0V_HELHED_03 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_03
@R.TAM-RE.RE@+Anew:@R.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_HELHED_04 ;
@D.TAM-RE.RE@ 0V_HELHED_04 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_04
@R.TAM-T.REM@+RemPst:@R.TAM-T.REM@ 0V_HELHED_05 ;
@D.TAM-T@ 0V_HELHED_05 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_05
@R.TAM-A.STAT@+Asp/Stat:@R.TAM-A.STAT@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROG@+Asp/Prog:@R.TAM-A.PROG@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@+Asp/ProgStat:@R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.PFV@+Asp/Pfv:@R.TAM-A.PFV@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@R.TAM-A.CONT@+Asp/Cont:@R.TAM-A.CONT@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;
@D.TAM-A@ 0V_HELHED_06 ;

LEXICON 0V_HELHED_06
@R.NMZ.V2N@+Vnoun:@R.NMZ.V2N@ DVN-POSS ;
@R.NMZ.V2A@+Ptc:@R.NMZ.V2A@ DVN-POSS ;
@D.NMZ@ DVN-POSS ;


LEXICON OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS
 DVN-POSS ;
 OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_š_OR_OCSP3
:ub OC1/2_š ;
 INDOCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3_OR_DVN-POSS
 DVN-POSS ;
 OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_s_OR_OCSP3
 OC1/2_s ;
 INDOCSP3 ;

LEXICON OC1/2_š
 OCSG1_š ;
 OCSG2_icid ;
 OCPL1 ;
 OCPL2 ;
 OCSP3 ;
 
LEXICON OC1/2_s
 OCSG1_c ;
 OCSG2_cid ;
:ub OCPL1 ;!CHECKME ub twice?
:ub OCPL2 ;
 OCSP3 ;


LEXICON OCSG1_š
@U.OBJ.1@+OcSg1:@U.OBJ.1@%>š DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSG1_c ! this has a -d counter part as in Hungarian Sg3 
@U.OBJ.1@+OcSg1:@U.OBJ.1@%>c DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSG2_icid
@U.OBJ.2@+OcSg2:@U.OBJ.2@%>icid DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSG2_cid
@U.OBJ.2@+OcSg2:@U.OBJ.2@%>cid DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCSP3
+OcSP3: DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON INDOCSP3
+OcSP3:%>xʷ DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCPL1
@U.OBJ.1@+OcPl1:@U.OBJ.1@%>uɬ DVN-POSS ;

LEXICON OCPL2
@U.OBJ.2@+OcPl2:@U.OBJ.2@%>uɬəd DVN-POSS ;

!+ScSg1:%>əd
!+ScSg2:%>əxʷ
!+ScSP3:%>əs
!+ScPl1:%>aɬi

LEXICON DVN-POSS
!@R.TAM@ K ;
@D.PossPx@ K ;!CHECK 2021-07-10
@R.PossPx.Sg1@@D.OBJ.1@+Der/s+N+Sg:@R.PossPx.Sg1@@D.OBJ.1@ PXSG1 ;
@R.PossPx.Sg2@@D.OBJ.2@+Der/s+N+Sg:@R.PossPx.Sg2@@D.OBJ.2@ PXSG2 ;
@U.PossPx.SP3@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.SP3@ PXSP3 ;
@U.PossPx.Pl1@@D.OBJ.1@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.Pl1@@D.OBJ.1@0 PXPL1 ;
@U.PossPx.Pl2@@D.OBJ.2@+Der/s+N+Sg:@U.PossPx.Pl2@@D.OBJ.2@0 PXPL2 ;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Adjectives
!  ----------
!! Adjectives in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language describe the entities nouns refer to.

LEXICON Adjectives
adjective    Comparisons   ;

bəsad+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəsad A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
bəɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}bəɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
cək̓ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}cək̓ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
cəwəɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}cəwəɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
dᶻixʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}dᶻixʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
haʔɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}haʔɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
hikʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}hikʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
kay̓kay̓alus+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}kay̓kay̓alus A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
miʔman̓+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}miʔman̓ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
q̓ič+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}q̓ič A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
stabaɬ+A:s%^√%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tabaɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
tagʷəxʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}tagʷəxʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
taqʷuʔ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}taqʷuʔ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
təɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}təɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
wix̌ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}wix̌ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
wələx̌ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}wələx̌ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
xʷəxʷaʔxʷəʔ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}xʷəxʷaʔxʷəʔ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ax̌aʔ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ax̌aʔ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ibəč̓+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ibəč̓ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌icil+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌icil A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ičəc+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ičəc A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌əɬ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌əɬ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌əɬəɬx̌əč+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌əɬəɬx̌əč A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ʷiqʷac+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ʷiqʷac A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
x̌ʷiqʷəq̓ʷ+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}x̌ʷiqʷəq̓ʷ A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
č̓uɬəyʔalus+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}č̓uɬəyʔalus A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
šəq+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}šəq A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;
ɬaw̓t+A:%{p5%}%{p4%}%{p3%}%{p2%}%{p1%}ɬaw̓t A_with-PL_RED2 "" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Adpositions
!  ----------
!! Adpositions in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language 

LEXICON Adpositions
ʔə+Pr:ʔə PR_ "of" ;
dxʷʔal+Pr:dxʷʔal PR_ "for, to, toward" ;
txʷəl+Pr:txʷəl PR_ "for, to, toward" ;
ʔal+Pr:ʔal PR_ "to" ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
!! Adverbs
!  --------
!! Adverbs in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language are words that express time, place, degree, mode.

LEXICON Verbs
bəq̓təb+V:bəq̓təb V_CUTEB "" ;
bəq̓əd+V:bəq̓əd TV_SELPED "" ;
bəƛ̕šadəb+V:bəƛ̕šadəb V_CUTEB "" ;
bəƛ̕əd+V:bəƛ̕əd TV_SELPED "" ;
caq̓ad+V:caq̓ad V_KWEDAD "" ;
cilid+V:cilid V_KWEDAD "" ;
cut+V:cut V_HELHED "" ;
cutab+V:cutab V_CUTEB_Dial/-NL "" ;
cuud+V:cuud V_KWEDAD "" ;
c̓agʷad+V:c̓agʷad V_KWEDAD "" ;
c̓agʷatsut+V:c̓agʷatsut V_KWEDAD "" ;
c̓agʷačiʔb+V:c̓agʷačiʔb V_HELHED "" ;
c̓ibid+V:c̓ibid V_KWEDAD "" ;
c̓ix̌alikʷ+V:c̓ix̌alikʷ V_KWEDAD "" ;
c̓ix̌id+V:c̓ix̌id V_KWEDAD "" ;
c̓əbəb+V:c̓əbəb V_CUTEB "" ;
diʔiʔil+V:diʔiʔil V_HELHED "" ;
dəgʷad+V:dəgʷad V_KWEDAD "" ;
dᶻax̌ʷad+V:dᶻax̌ʷad V_KWEDAD "" ;
dᶻubalikʷ+V:dᶻubalikʷ V_KWEDAD "" ;
dᶻəqil+V:dᶻəqil V_HELHED "" ;
gəqil+V:gəqil V_HELHED "" ;
gʷiid+V:gʷiid V_KWEDAD "" ;
gʷədil+V:gʷədil V_HELHED "" ;
gʷəqilič+V:gʷəqilič V_HELHED "" ;
gʷəč̓təb+V:gʷəč̓təb V_CUTEB "" ;
gʷəč̓əb+V:gʷəč̓əb V_CUTEB "" ;
gʷəč̓əd+V:gʷəč̓əd TV_SELPED "" ;
gʷəƛ̕əlad+V:gʷəƛ̕əlad V_KWEDAD "" ;
huy+V:huy V_HUY "" ;
huyud+V:huyud V_KWEDAD "" ;
huyutsut+V:huyutsut V_KWEDAD "" ;
huyutəb+V:huyutəb V_CUTEB "" ;
həliʔil+V:həliʔil V_HELHED "" ;
kaw̓ɬəbid+V:kaw̓ɬəbid V_KWEDAD "" ;
kiis+V:kiis V_KWEDAD "" ;
kʷatač+V:kʷatač V_KWEDAD "" ;
kʷukʷcut+V:kʷukʷcut V_HELHED "" ;
kʷədad+V:kʷədad V_KWEDAD "" ;
kʷədayitəb+V:kʷədayitəb V_CUTEB "" ;
kʷədšid+V:kʷəd»šíd V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL "" ;
k̓ʷasəb+V:k̓ʷasəb V_CUTEB "" ;
k̓ʷil+V:k̓ʷil V_HELHED "" ;
k̓ʷit̕+V:k̓ʷit̕ V_KWEDAD "" ;
k̓ʷəšəd+V:k̓ʷəšəd TV_SELPED "" ;
k̓ʷəɬəd+V:k̓ʷəɬəd TV_SELPED "" ;
labdxʷ+V:labd V_HUYTXW "" ;
laqusəb+V:laqusəb V_CUTEB "" ;
laʔbəd+V:laʔbəd TV_SELPED "" ;
luƛ̕il+V:luƛ̕il V_HELHED "" ;
lək̓ʷyid+V:lək̓ʷyid V_KWEDAD "" ;
lək̓ʷyitəb+V:lək̓ʷyitəb V_CUTEB "" ;
lək̓ʷəd+V:lək̓ʷəd V_HELHED "" ;
ləliʔil+V:ləliʔil V_HELHED "" ;
ləx̌i+V:ləx̌i V_HELHED "" ;
ləx̌ilič+V:ləx̌ilič V_HELHED "" ;
pədixʷalusil+V:pədixʷalusil V_HELHED "" ;
p̓ayəq+V:p̓áyəq V_HELHED "" ;
qələb+V:qələb V_CUTEB "" ;
qʷalctxʷ+V:qʷalct V_HUYTXW "" ;
qʷibid+V:qʷibid V_KWEDAD "" ;
qʷiʔaac+V:qʷiʔaac V_HELHED "" ;
q̓ax̌ʷ+V:q̓ax̌ʷ V_HELHED "" ;
q̓ilid+V:q̓ilid V_KWEDAD "" ;
q̓ʷuʔ+V:q̓ʷuʔ IV_HELHED "" ;
q̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd+V:q̓ʷuʔgʷəsəd TV_SELPED "" ;
q̓ʷuʔtxʷ+V:q̓ʷuʔt V_HUYTXW "" ;
q̓ʷuʔtəb+V:q̓ʷuʔtəb V_CUTEB "" ;
q̓ʷuʔəd+V:q̓ʷuʔəd TV_SELPED "" ;
q̓ʷəl+V:q̓ʷəl V_KWEDAD "" ;
q̓ʷəlb+V:q̓ʷəlb V_CUTEB "" ;
q̓ʷəlil+V:q̓ʷəlil V_HELHED "" ;
saq̓ʷ+V:saq̓ʷ V_KWEDAD "" ;
saxʷab+V:saxʷab V_CUTEB_Dial/-NL "" ;
səlpəd+V:səlpəd TV_SELPED "" ;
səx̌əb+V:səx̌əb V_CUTEB "" ;
tagʷš+v1+V:tàgʷš V_KWEDAD "" ;
taxʷačib+v1+V:taxʷačib V_CUTEB "" ;
taxʷačib+v1+V:taxʷačib V_HELHED "" ;
tibicut+V:tibicut V_HELHED "" ;
tix̌ix̌dubut+V:tix̌ix̌dubut V_HUYTXW "" ;
tix̌ix̌dxʷ+V:tix̌ix̌d V_HUYTXW "" ;
tuləkʷ+V:tuləkʷ V_KWEDAD "" ;
təlawil+V:təlawil V_HELHED "" ;
təsadiʔ+v1+V:tsadiʔ V_HELHED "" ;
təyil+V:təyil V_HELHED "" ;
təɬildxʷ+V:təɬild V_HUYTXW "" ;
t̓ək̓ʷəb+V:t̓ək̓ʷəb V_CUTEB "" ;
t̕ilib+V:t̕ilib V_HELHED "" ;
t̕it̕əb+V:t̕it̕əb V_CUTEB "" ;
wiliq̓ʷid+V:wíliq̓ʷid V_KWEDAD "" ;
wiliq̓ʷitəb+V:wíliq̓ʷitəb V_CUTEB "" ;
wəliʔi+V:wəliʔi V_HELHED "" ;
xʷak̓ʷisəb+V:xʷak̓ʷisəb V_CUTEB "" ;
xʷəbxʷəbacəb+V:xʷəbxʷəbacəb V_CUTEB "" ;
x̌aab+V:x̌aab V_CUTEB "" ;
x̌ac̓iǰəd+V:x̌ac̓iǰəd TV_SELPED "" ;
x̌ahab+V:x̌ahab V_CUTEB "" ;
x̌alšid+V:x̌alšid V_KWEDAD "" ;
x̌ayəb+V:x̌áyəb V_CUTEB "" ;
x̌aƛ̕+V:x̌aƛ̕ V_HELHED "" ;
x̌ib+V:x̌ib V_HELHED "" ;
x̌udx̌ud+V:x̌udx̌ud V_KWEDAD_Dial/-NL "" ;
x̌udx̌udbid+V:x̌udx̌udbid V_KWEDAD_Dial/-NL "" ;
x̌ədəd+V:x̌ədəd TV_SELPED "" ;
x̌ək̓ʷud+V:x̌ək̓ʷud V_KWEDAD "" ;
yuwiʔpačəb+V:yuwiʔpačəb V_CUTEB "" ;
yəcəb+V:yəcəb V_CUTEB "" ;
yəhaw̓txʷ+V:yəhaw̓t V_HUYTXW "" ;
čil+V:čil V_HELHED "" ;
č̓əɬab+V:č̓əɬab V_CUTEB "" ;
šub+V:šub V_KWEDAD "" ;
šudxʷ+V:šudxʷ V_HUYTXW "" ;
šulud+V:šulud V_SELPED "" ;
šəqačiʔb+V:šəqačiʔb V_KWEDAD "" ;
šəqšəqačib+V:šəqšəqačib V_CUTEB "" ;
ƛ̕ax̌ʷ+v1+V:ƛ̕ax̌ʷ V_HELHED "" ;
ƛ̕iqid+V:ƛ̕iqid V_KWEDAD "" ;
ƛ̕uq̓ʷəld+V:ƛ̕uq̓ʷəld V_HELHED "" ;
ǰuʔil+V:ǰuʔil V_HELHED "" ;
ɬax̌il+V:ɬax̌il V_HELHED "" ;
ɬaʔačiʔb+V:ɬaʔačiʔb V_HELHED "" ;
ɬič̓itəb+V:ɬič̓itəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ɬič̓txʷ+V:ɬič̓t V_HUYTXW "" ;
ɬiʔɬdahəb+V:ɬiʔɬdahəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ɬx̌ilč+V:ɬx̌ilč V_KWEDAD "" ;
ɬəči+V:ɬəči V_HELHED "" ;
ʔa+V:ʔa V_HELHED "" ;
ʔababačib+V:ʔababačib V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔabačib+V:ʔabačib V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔabyitəb+V:ʔabyitəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔabšid+V:ʔab»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL "" ;
ʔabšədəb+V:ʔabšədəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔatəbəd+V:ʔatəbəd V_SELPED "" ;
ʔibibəš+V:ʔibibəš V_KWEDAD "" ;
ʔilid+V:ʔilid V_KWEDAD "" ;
ʔistəb+V:ʔistəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔitut+V:ʔítut V_HELHED "" ;
ʔiʔɬadəb+V:ʔìʔɬádəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔiʔɬəd+V:ʔiʔɬəd TV_SELPED "" ;
ʔukʷukʷ+V:ʔukʷukʷ V_KWEDAD "" ;
ʔuluɬ+V:ʔuluɬ V_HELHED "" ;
ʔut̕ičəb+V:ʔut̕ičəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔut̕šədəb+V:ʔut̕šədəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔux̌ʷ+V:ʔux̌ʷ V_KWEDAD "" ;
ʔux̌ʷc+V:ʔux̌ʷc V_HELHED "" ;
ʔux̌ʷtxʷyitəb+V:ʔux̌ʷtxʷyitəb V_CUTEB "" ;
ʔux̌ʷtxʷšid+V:ʔux̌ʷtxʷ»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL "" ;
ʔux̌ʷšid+V:ʔux̌ʷ»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL "" ;
ʔəy̓dxʷšid+V:ʔəy̓dxʷ»šid V_KWEDYID_Dial/-NL "" ;
ʔəy̓dxʷšitəb+V:ʔəy̓dxʷšitəb V_CUTEB_Dial/-NL "" ;
ʔəƛ̕c+V:ʔəƛ̕c V_KWEDAD "" ;
